Missouri, session 2026, SB1093.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 568.045, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 568.045,
to read as follows:
568.045. 1. A person commits the offense of
endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree if he
or she:
(1) Knowingly acts in a manner that creates a
substantial risk to the life, body, or health of a child
less than seventeen years of age;
(2) Knowingly engages in sexual conduct with a person
under the age of eighteen years over whom the person is a
parent, guardian, or otherwise charged with the care and
custody;
(3) Knowingly encourages, aids, or causes a child less
than seventeen years of age to engage in any conduct which
violates the provisions of chapter 571 or 579; [or]
(4) In the presence of a child less than seventeen
years of age or in a residence where a child less than
seventeen years of age resides, unlawfully manufactures or
attempts to manufacture compounds, possesses, produces,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1093 2
prepares, sells, transports, tests or analyzes any of the
following: fentanyl, carfentanil, amphetamine, or
methamphetamine, or any analogue thereof; or
(5) Knowingly fails to secure a readily available
firearm, as defined in section 571.010, in the presence of a
child under seventeen years of age or in a residence where a
child under seventeen years of age resides. For the
purposes of this subdivision, the term "secure" means
storing a firearm in a locked safe, cabinet, gun vault, or
storage case or using a firearm locking device. It shall
not be an affirmative defense to a charge under this
subdivision if the offense results in the death of a child
and the death is determined to be the result of a suicide.
2. The offense of endangering the welfare of a child
in the first degree is a class D felony unless the offense:
(1) Is committed as part of an act or series of acts
performed by two or more persons as part of an established
or prescribed pattern of activity, or where physical injury
to the child results, or the offense is a second or
subsequent offense under this section, in which case the
offense is a class C felony;
(2) Involves fentanyl or carfentanil, or any analogue
thereof, in which case:
(a) The offense is a class B felony; and
(b) A person sentenced under this subdivision shall
not be eligible for conditional release or parole until he
or she has served at least five years of imprisonment;
(3) Results in serious physical injury to the child,
in which case the offense is a class B felony; or
(4) Results in the death of a child, in which case the
offense is a class A felony.
✓